Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 1. Certified Real Estate Appraiser Act
§ 33-39-123.
Disciplinary proceedings.

The board shall upon a written sworn complaint or may upon its own motion investigate the actions of any certified real estate appraiser or certified appraiser trainee and may impose an administrative fine not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500.00) for each separate offense, censure the permittee, place the permittee on probation and set the terms of the probation, deny, suspend or revoke any permit issued under this act for any of the following:

Procuring, or attempting to procure, a permit to practice pursuant to this act by knowingly making a false statement, submitting false information, refusing to provide complete information in response to a question in an application for a permit or through any form of fraud or misrepresentation;

Being convicted of a felony that relates to the practice of real estate appraisal or to the ability to practice real estate appraisal or any felony sexual offense or violent crime;

Making any substantial misrepresentation, false promises or false or fraudulent representation;

Violating any rules or regulations of the board or any provision of this chapter;

Being negligent or incompetent, as defined in the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practices, in developing an appraisal, in preparing an appraisal report or in communicating an appraisal;

Accepting an appraisal assignment when the employment is contingent upon the certified appraiser reporting a predetermined estimate, analysis or opinion, or where the fee to be paid is contingent upon the opinion, conclusion, or valuation reached, or upon the consequences resulting from the appraisal assignment;

Violating the confidential nature of governmental records to which he or she gained access through employment or engagement as a certified appraiser by a governmental agency;

Entering into an agreement to perform specialized services for a contingent fee, and failing to clearly state this fact in each written and oral report;

Failing to report to the board any civil or criminal proceedings in which the permittee is a party, if the proceeding involves appraisal services provided by the permittee. The requirement to report to the board under this paragraph shall include providing the board with a copy of the complaint, information or other initial pleading upon receipt and immediately providing the board with a copy of the final judgment, judgment and sentence, settlement agreement or other document reflecting the terms of the final disposition of the proceeding;

Use of the services of an appraisal management company not registered with the board.

Upon receipt from the department of family services of a certified copy of an order from a court to withhold, suspend or otherwise restrict a permit issued by the board, the board shall notify the party named in the court order of the withholding, suspension or restriction of the permit in accordance with the terms of the court order. No appeal under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act shall be allowed for a permit withheld, suspended or restricted under this subsection.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 128, § 1; 1997, ch. 128, § 2; 2007, ch. 184, § 1; 2018 ch. 107, § 2, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a) inserted “impose an administrative fine not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500.00) for each separate offense, censure the permittee, place the permittee on probation and set the terms of the probation,”; added (a)(ix), and made related changes.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a)(ii), inserted “that relates to the practice of real estate appraisal or to the ability to practice real estate appraisal or any felony sexual offense or violent crime” following “felony.”

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in the introductory language in (a), added “or certified appraiser trainee” following “certified real estate appraiser” and substituted “probation, deny, suspend” for “probation, suspend,” in (a)(i), substituted “Procuring, or attempting to procure, a permit” for “Procuring a permit,” in (a)(iv), substituted “of the board or any provision of this chapter” for “of the board,” and added (a)(x).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-39-102(a)(xvii).

§ 33-39-124.
Hearing.

The hearing on any charge of violation of W.S.

33-39-123

shall be at a time and place prescribed by the board and in accordance with the provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 128, § 1.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

§ 33-39-125.
Retention of records.

A certified real estate appraiser shall retain, for at least seven (7) years, originals or true copies of all written contracts engaging his services for real estate appraisal work, and all reports and supporting data assembled and formulated by the appraiser in preparing the reports.

The seven (7) year period for retention of records provided by subsection (a) of this section is applicable to each engagement of the services of the appraiser and shall commence upon the date of the submittal of the appraisal to the client unless, within the seven (7) year period, the appraiser is notified that the appraisal or report is involved in litigation, in which event the seven (7) year period for the retention of records shall commence upon the date of the final disposition of the litigation.

All records required to be maintained under the provisions of this act shall be made available by the certified real estate appraiser for inspection and copying by the board on reasonable notice to the appraiser.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 128, § 1; 2007, ch. 184, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “seven (7)” for “ten (10)” throughout (a) and (b).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-39-102(a)(xvii).

§ 33-39-126.
Certified real estate appraiser education account created; initial monies; fees.

There is created a certified real estate appraiser education account which shall be under the direction of the board.

Every person obtaining or renewing a certified appraiser trainee or certified real estate appraiser’s permit shall pay an additional fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) which shall be deposited in the certified appraiser education account.

All civil penalties levied under this act shall be collected, paid to the state treasurer and credited as provided in W.S.

8-1-109

.

When the certified appraiser education account balance exceeds fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) the board shall not collect annual fees under this section.

The board may use the funds in the education account for the purposes of raising the standards of practice and the competency of permittees by:

Promoting the advancement of education and research for the benefit of those issued permits under this act;

Underwriting educational seminars and all other similar forms of educational projects for the benefit of permittees; and

Contracting for particular education or research projects to further the purposes of this section.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 128, § 1; 2005, ch. 157, § 2; ch. 231, § 1; 2007, ch. 184, § 1; 2019 ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 157, § 2, substituted “collected, paid to the state treasurer and credited as provided in W.S.

8-1-109

” for “deposited in the education account” in (c).

Laws 2005, ch. 157, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 26, 2005.

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 231, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the earmarked revenue fund” following “account” in (a).

See the conflicting legislation note. This section is set out incorporating amendments by both 2005 acts.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a) substituted “board” for “commission” at the end of the sentence; in (b) inserted “trainee or” preceding “certified real estate.”

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted "Every person" for "Beginning January 1, 1990, every person" and substituted "renewing a certified appraiser trainee" for "renewing a trainee."

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-39-102(a)(xvii).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 33-39-127.
Enjoining violations of chapter.

Any person who violates or proposes to violate any provisions of this act, or any rules and regulations promulgated under this act, may be restrained or enjoined from the action at any time by an order issued by the district court. An action may be initiated by the attorney general or the district attorney for the county in which the violation has or is about to occur.

Any defendant so enjoined who violates an injunction shall be punished for contempt of court by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six (6) months or both.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 128, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-39-102(a)(xvii).

§ 33-39-128.
Contested cases; independent hearing officers; appeals.

The board may contract with independent hearing officers to hear all contested cases arising under this act. The hearing officer shall not be an employee of the office of the attorney general, or an employee or member of the board.

All hearings shall be conducted pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. A hearing officer has the power specified in W.S. 16-3-112(b). The hearing officer shall make in each contested case and forward to the board written findings of fact and conclusions of law.

Any judicial review of the administrative decision under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act may be in the district court in the county where the violation allegedly occurred.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 128, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-39-102(a)(xvii).

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

§ 33-39-129.
Penalties.

Any person acting or purporting to act as a certified real estate appraiser without first obtaining a permit to practice under this act is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or by imprisonment in the county jail for a term not to exceed six (6) months or both. Upon conviction of a subsequent violation the person shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or by imprisonment in the county jail for a term not to exceed one (1) year or both. Charges may be initiated by the office of the attorney general with the board as the complainant.

If any person receives any money or the equivalent thereof as a fee, commission, compensation or profit by or in consequence of a violation of any provision of this act, he shall, in addition, be liable to a penalty of not less than the amount of the sum of money so received and not more than three (3) times the sum so received as may be determined by the court, which penalty may be recovered in a court of competent jurisdiction by any person aggrieved.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 128, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-39-102(a)(xvii).

§ 33-39-130.
Noncertified person may not maintain action for fee.

No action or suit shall be instituted, nor recovery be had, in any court of this state by any person for compensation for any act done or service rendered as a certified real estate appraiser, unless the person held a permit to practice under this act at the time of offering to perform any act or service as a certified real estate appraiser or procuring any promise to contract for the payment of compensation for any contemplated act or service as a certified real estate appraiser.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 128, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-39-102(a)(xvii).